District of Columbia statutes.
42-3213

Landlord’s lien for rent — Time of existence.

The landlord shall have a tacit lien for his rent upon such of the tenant’s personal chattels, on the premises, as are subject to execution for debt, to commence with the tenancy and continue for 3 months after the rent is due and until the termination of any action for such rent brought within said 3 months.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1383, ch. 854, § 1229
1981 Ed., § 45-1413.
1973 Ed., § 45-915.